Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,109
Default of owner; right of encumbrancers to appear.

Any persons claiming to hold an encumbrance upon any portion of the property involved in the suit, may, in default of the owner, appear and act as his representative in any of the proceedings under sections 25-2170 to 25-21,111.

R.S.1867, Code § 842, p. 542;

R.S.1913, § 8325;

C.S.1922, § 9277;

C.S.1929, § 20-21,109;

R.S.1943, § 25-21,109.

Owner by defaulting cannot defeat the rights of an encumbrancer. Hartman v. Drake, 166 Neb. 87, 87 N.W.2d 895 (1958).